Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds,  collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
[(a) Mission Critical Facility ]
[Yellow Lot Building ......................... $ 4,579,431]
(a) Oregon Resilience Buildings ..... $ 7,079,431
(b) Department of Human
Services Building Upgrades ............ $ 3,743,000
(c) Employment Building
Upgrades .............................................$ 6,236,000
(d) Electrical Upgrades and
Replacements ......................................$ 3,890,000
(e) Capitol Mall Parking
Structure Study and
Upgrades .............................................$ 2,926,000
(f) Planning ..............................................$ 500,000
(g) Boiler and Heating
Upgrades .............................................$ 1,234,000
(h) Portland Crime Lab
Upgrade ...............................................$ 1,162,000
(i) Parking Lot Upgrades ...................... $ 3,500,000
(j) Portland State Office
Building Renovation ......................... $ 13,146,000
(k) State Data Center
Power Upgrades ................................ $ 11,000,000
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 1
(L) Elected Official Staff
Relocation ...........................................$ 6,300,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Regional Armory
Emergency Enhancement ................ $ 8,534,400
(b) Grants Pass Armory Service
Life Extension .................................... $ 3,270,356
(c) Future Readiness Center
Sites......................................................$ 1,730,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Capital Improvements ...................... $ 17,168,249
(b) MacLaren 7 West Cottages
Renovation ..........................................$ 21,177,200
(c) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 10,973,465
(4) Department of Corrections:
(a) Capital Improvements and
[Renewal ..............................................$ 26,293,534]
Renewal..................................... $ 26,347,534
(b) Technology Infrastructure .............. $ 12,200,000
(5) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(a) Roseburg Veterans’ Home ............... $ 10,500,000
(b) Oregon Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements ...................... $ 2,450,000
(c) The Dalles Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements............... $ 2,111,875
(d) Lebanon Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements............... $ 1,305,815
(6) Department of Transportation,
Toledo Maintenance
Station Phase 1 .................................. $ 6,300,000
(7) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Bandon Electrical, Gate,
Obstruction Removal ........................ $ 192,500
(b) McDermitt State Airport
Runway and Taxi .............................. $ 120,000
(c) Chiloquin Taxi and Fencing ........... $ 110,000
(d) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation ..................................... $ 110,000
(8) State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, Deferred Maintenance ..... $ 10,000,000
(9) State Forestry Department,
Toledo Facility Replacement .......... $ 3,832,965
(10) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Family Affordable Housing ............. $ 80,000,000
(11) Department of
Education, Oregon School
for the Deaf Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 4,297,558
(12) Legislative Administration
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 2
Committee, Capitol Accessibility
[Maintenance and Safety .................. $ 13,720,642]
Maintenance and Safety ............ $ 23,269,092
(13) Oregon Judicial Department:
(a) Multnomah County Courthouse
Furnishings and Equipment ............ $ 8,900,000
(b) Oregon Supreme Court
Building Renovation ......................... $ 6,000,000
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year  period beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for the expenditure of
federal funds collected or received  by the [ Oregon Department of Aviation ] state agencies listed ,
for the acquisition  of land and the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing
and equipping of buildings and facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of Aviation:
[(1)] (a) Bandon Electrical, Gate,
Obstruction Removal ........................ $ 1,732,500
[(2)] (b) McDermitt State Airport
Runway and Taxi .............................. $ 1,080,000
[(3)] (c) Chiloquin Taxi and Fencing .... $ 990,000
[(4)] (d) Lebanon Taxi and Apron
Rehabilitation ..................................... $ 990,000
(2) Oregon Military Department,
Camp Umatilla Facilities
Biomass Heating Upgrades ....... $ 6,125,000
(3) Department of Veterans’
Affairs:
(a) The Dalles Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements............... $ 3,922,053
(b) Lebanon Veterans’ Home
Capital Improvements............... $ 2,425,085
SECTION 3.
 Section 3, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of [ $330,825,000]
$405,475,000 is established for a six-year period  beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and
reimbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received by the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission,
for expenditures of proceeds from state bonds issued for the benefit  of a public university, pursuant
to agreements between the commission and a public university.
SECTION 4.  Section 1, chapter 808, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section  1, chapter 67,
Oregon Laws 2016, and section 10, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2015, as the maximum limits  for payment of expenses
from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds
and federal funds,  collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of land and
the acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping of buildings  and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
(a) North Campus Demolition
and Site Improvement ...................... $ 8,300,000
(b) Department of Environmental
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 3
Quality Public Health Lab
Emergency Generator Upgrade ..... $ 2,926,140
(c) Employment Building Upgrades .... $ 2,217,398
(d) Electrical Upgrades/
Replacements ......................................$ 2,089,795
(e) Department of Human
Services Building, Cooling
Tower Replacement .......................... $ 1,701,702
(f) Executive Building
Elevator Upgrades ............................ $ 875,461
(g) Executive Building Fire
Sprinkler..............................................$ 89,322
(h) Planning ..............................................$ 350,000
(i) Capital Investments/
Acquisitions ........................................$ 17,000,000
(j) Executive Building Central
Stairway Upgrade ............................. $ 377,443
(k) Oregon State Fair
Capital Repairs and
Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 2,500,000
(2) Oregon Military Department:
(a) New Headquarters
Facilities ..............................................$  6,700,000
(b) Youth Challenge Armory ................ $ 4,977,000
(c) Planning and Predesign ................... $ 136,281
[(d) Oregon Military Museum ................. $ 725,963]
(d) Oregon Military Museum .......... $ 1,104,689
(e) Regional Training Institute ............ $ 11,500,000
(3) Oregon Youth Authority:
(a) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 9,880,000
(b) MacLaren Facility
Improvements ..................................... $ 30,934,000
(c) CCTV Cameras .................................. $ 1,147,435
(d) Deferred Maintenance
and Capital Improvements .............. $ 7,058,000
(4) Department of Corrections,
Deferred Maintenance ..................... $ 14,220,432
(5) Housing and Community
Services Department,
Family Affordable Housing ............. $ 40,000,000
(6) Department of Transportation:
(a) South Coast Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 4,500,000
(b) Meacham Maintenance
Station .................................................$ 7,500,000
(c) Maintenance Facilities
Colocation ...........................................$ 1
(d) Highway Improvement
Projects ................................................$ 35,000,000
(7) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Condon State Airport,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 4
Renovations ........................................$ 226,111
(b) McDermitt State Airport,
[Rehabilitation .................................... $ 201,667]
Rehabilitation............................ $ 259,599
(c) Aurora State Airport, Apron/
Taxiway and Taxilane Project ....... $ 130,000
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs, The Dalles Veterans’
Home Renovation .............................. $ 2,475,976
(9) State Department of Fish and
Wildlife:
(a) Cedar Creek Hatchery and Fish
Passage Improvements ..................... $ 2,000,000
(b) Lower Deschutes River Ranch
Acquisition ..........................................$ 227,269
(10) Legislative Administration Committee,
State Capitol Capital Repairs
and Improvements ............................. $ 30,000,000
SECTION 5.
 Section 2, chapter 808, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section  2, chapter 67,
Oregon Laws 2016, and section 11, chapter 747, Oregon Laws 2017, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the  following amounts are estab-
lished for a six-year period beginning July 1, 2015, as the maximum limits for  the expenditure of
federal funds collected or received by the state agencies listed, for the acquisition of land and the
acquisition, planning, constructing, altering, repairing, furnishing and equipping  of buildings and
facilities:
(1) Oregon Military Department:
(a) Planning and Predesign ................... $ 140,770
(b) New Headquarters
Facilities ..............................................$ 18,463,000
(c) Medford Armory ................................ $ 2,884,448
(d) Baker City Readiness Center ......... $ 750,000
(e) Sharff Hall/Maison Armory ............ $ 2,051,033
(2) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife:
(a) Willamette Falls Fishway
Repair ..................................................$ 1,000,000
(b) Lower Deschutes River
Ranch Acquisition ............................. $ 1,323,750
(c) Clackamas Hatchery Intake
System..................................................$ 450,000
(3) Oregon Department of Aviation:
(a) Condon State Airport,
Renovations ........................................$ 2,035,000
(b) McDermitt State Airport,
[Rehabilitation .................................... $ 1,815,000]
Rehabilitation............................ $ 2,336,380
(c) Aurora State Airport, Apron/
Taxiway and Taxilane Project ....... $ 1,170,000
(4) Department of Veterans’
Affairs, The Dalles Veterans’
Home Renovation .............................. $ 3,302,891
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 5
SECTION 6. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5701 (SB 5701-A) Page 6